Idaho, session 2026, S1454.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare Divi-
sion of Early Learning and Development the following amounts to be expended
according to the designated programs and expense classes from the listed
funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. EARLY LEARNING AND DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $600,000 $600,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $426,300 $478,600 3,337,900 4,242,800
TOTAL $426,300 $478,600 $3,937,900 $4,842,800


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
II. SOUTHWEST IDAHO TREATMENT CENTER:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $14,500 $14,500
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 5,500 5,500
TOTAL $20,000 $20,000
GRAND TOTAL $426,300 $478,600 $20,000 $3,937,900 $4,862,800
SECTION 2. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare Divi-
sion of Youth Safety and Permanency the following amounts to be expended ac-
cording to the designated programs and expense classes from the Cooperative
Welfare (General) Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Youth Safety & Permanency $250,000 $250,000
Foster & Assistance Payments 0 $431,900 431,900
TOTAL $250,000 $431,900 $681,900
SECTION 3. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare Di-
vision of Family and Community Partnerships $180,000 from the Cooperative
Welfare (Federal) Fund to be expended for operating expenditures for the
period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, for the purpose of the Kinship
Navigation Grant.
SECTION 4. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Health and Welfare Division of Early Learning and De-
velopment is hereby increased by three (3.00) for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. REQUIRING A REPORT FOR THE IDAHO HOME VISITING PROGRAM. The
Department of Health and Welfare shall submit a report to the Joint Finance-
Appropriations Committee by December 31, 2026, identifying outcomes and re-
turn on investment for moneys appropriated for the Idaho Home Visiting Pro-
gram. The format and content of this report will be determined in consul-


tation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Ser-
vices Office.
SECTION 6. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Welfare Di-
vision of Early Learning and Development may transfer moneys appropriated
for personnel costs and trustee and benefit payments pursuant to Section
67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 7. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Welfare
Division of Youth Safety and Permanency may transfer moneys appropriated
for personnel costs and trustee and benefit payments pursuant to Section
67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 8. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Welfare Divi-
sion of Youth Safety and Permanency is hereby exempted from the provisions
of Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers into the
Southwest Idaho Treatment Center Program for all moneys appropriated to the
division for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 9. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 10. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Welfare Divi-
sion of Youth Safety and Permanency is hereby exempted from the provisions
of Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers into the
Southwest Idaho Treatment Center Program for all moneys appropriated to the
division for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 11. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 10 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 9 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.